District of Columbia statutes.
1-1106.51

Repealed

Prohibition on the use of District government resources for campaign related activities.

Repealed.

Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 470, Pub. L. 93-376, title VI-A, § 651
as added Oct. 13, 2001, D.C. Law 14-36, § 2, 48 DCR 7111
April 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(d), 59 DCR 1862
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 401(d) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).